Hawaii statutes.
§353E-1 Sex offender treatment; statewide
program established. There is established the statewide integrated sex
offender treatment program for the treatment of adult sex offenders in the
custody of the State and juvenile sex offenders in cases where family court
jurisdiction was waived pursuant to section 571-22, to be implemented on a
cooperative basis by the department of public safety, judiciary, Hawaii
paroling authority, department of health, department of human services, and any
other agency that may be assigned sex offender oversight responsibilities. The
sex offender treatment program shall:

(1) Develop and continually update, as necessary, a
comprehensive statewide master plan for the assessment, evaluation, treatment,
and supervision of sex offenders that
provides for a continuum of programs under a best practices philosophy;

(2) Develop and implement a statewide, integrated
system of sex offender assessment, evaluation, treatment, and supervision
services and programs that reflect the goals and objectives of the master plan;

(3) Identify all offenders in their custody who would
benefit from sex offender treatment;

(4) Work cooperatively to monitor and evaluate the
development and implementation of sex offender assessment, evaluation, supervision,
and treatment programs and services;

(5) Develop appropriate training and education
programs for public and private providers of sex offender treatment,
assessment, evaluation, and supervision services;

(6) Conduct research and compile relevant data on sex
offenders;

(7) Work cooperatively to develop a statewide
management information system for sex offender treatment;

(8) Make every effort to secure grant funds for
research, program development, training, and public education in the area of
sex assault prevention;

(9) Network with public and private agencies that
come into contact with sex offenders to keep abreast of issues that impact and
increase community awareness regarding the statewide sex offender treatment
program;

(10) As far as practicable, share information and pool
resources to carry out responsibilities under this chapter;

(11) Coordinate their funding requests for sex offender
treatment programs to deter competition for resources that might result in an
imbalance in program development that is detrimental to the master plan
treatment concept; and

(12) Develop and
implement standards and guidelines for the assessment, evaluation, treatment,
and supervision of sex offenders. [L 1992, c 164, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 36, §1]

Case Notes

Although the master plan did not specifically discuss
polygraph testing as a treatment tool for sex offenders, use of polygraphs not
precluded under the Hawaii sex offender treatment program. 92 H. 289 (App.),
990 P.2d 1171 (1999).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next